Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB256.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards in Child Care Facilities Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved carbon monoxide alarm." The term includes:(1) A single or multiple station carbon monoxide alarm listed as complying with the Standard for Single and Multiple Station Carbon Monoxide Alarms (ANSI/UL2034) or a carbon monoxide detector listed as complying with the Standard for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075) installed 1234567891011121314151617 in accordance with this act.(2) A device that may be combined with a smoke alarm or smoke detector if the combined smoke alarm or smoke detector meets all of the following:(i) Complies with either of the following:(A) The Standard for Single and Multiple Station Carbon Monoxide Alarms (ANSI/UL2034) for carbon monoxide alarms and the Standard for Single and Multiple Station Smoke Alarms (ANSI/UL217) for smoke alarms.(B) The Standard for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075) for carbon monoxide detectors and the Standard for Safety for Smoke Detectors for Fire Alarm Systems (ANSI/UL268) for smoke detectors.(ii) Emits an alarm in a manner that clearly differentiates between detecting the presence of carbon monoxide and the presence of smoke.(3) A carbon monoxide detection system that includes carbon monoxide detectors and audible notification appliances that are installed and maintained in accordance with the National Fire Alarm and Signaling Code (NFPA 72) and the Standard for the Installation of Carbon Monoxide (CO) Detection and Warning Equipment (NFPA 720) and are in compliance with the Standard for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075)."Child care." Care in lieu of parental care given for part of the day to a child under 16 years of age away from their own home. The term does not include child care furnished in places of worship during religious services."Child care facility." Any of the following:20250SB0256PN0210 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A premises in which child care is provided for a period exceeding 24 hours for a child under 16 years of age who is not a relative of the operator and who is not accompanied by a parent, individual standing in loco parentis or legal guardian. For purposes of this paragraph, the term does not include a premises selected for care of a child by a parent, individual standing in loco parentis or legal guardian for a period of 30 days or less or a facility operated under social service auspices.(2) A premises in which child care is provided simultaneously for seven or more children who are not relatives of the operator, except a facility operated under social service auspices.(3) A home where child care is provided at any time to no less than four children and no more than six children who are not relatives of the caregiver.(4) A nursery school that is licensed and regulated by the Commonwealth."Fossil fuel." Coal, kerosene, oil, wood, fuel gases and other petroleum or hydrocarbon products which emit carbon monoxide as a by-product of combustion."Human Services Code." The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code."Installed." A carbon monoxide alarm that is hardwired into the electrical wiring, directly plugged into an electrical outlet without a switch, other than a circuit breaker, or, if the alarm is battery-powered, attached to the wall or ceiling of a unit of a child care facility, in accordance with the Standard for the Installation of Carbon Monoxide (CO) Detection and Warning Equipment (NFPA 720).20250SB0256PN0210 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Operational." Working and in service."Unit." A room or suite of two or more rooms that is occupied as a residence, intended or designed to be occupied as a residence, or is occupied by a client of a child care facility.Section 3. Administration.Nothing in this act is intended to modify the authority and responsibilities of the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.Section 4. Carbon monoxide alarm requirements.Each building in which a child care facility is in operation, which uses a fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance, fireplace or an attached garage, must have an operational, centrally located and approved carbon monoxide alarm installed in the vicinity of the fossil-fuel-burning heater or fireplace and in every unit that is located on the same story as the fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance within 18 months of the effective date of this section.Section 5. Licensure.(a) General rule.--Except as provided under subsection (b), the Department of Human Services may not issue or renew a license for a child care facility supervised or licensed under Article IX or X of the Human Services Code if the child care facility fails to meet the requirements under section 4.(b) Provisional licensure.--If a child care facility licensed under Article X of the Human Services Code is not in compliance with the requirements of section 4, the Department of Human Services may issue a provisional license in accordance with section 1008 of the Human Services Code.20250SB0256PN0210 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0256PN0210 - 5 - 12